Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201569-2708
Stamping agent; duties; Tax Commissioner; Attorney General; powers.

(1) Not later than fifteen days following the end of each month, each stamping agent shall submit, in the manner directed by the Tax Commissioner, such information as the Tax Commissioner requires to facilitate compliance with sections 69-2704 to 69-2711, including, but not limited to (a) a list by brand family of the total number of cigarettes or, in the case of roll-your-own, the equivalent stick count for which the stamping agent affixed stamps during the previous month or otherwise paid the total due for such cigarettes, the total number of cigarettes contained in the packages to which it affixed each respective type of stamp, and by name and number of cigarettes, the tobacco product manufacturers and brand families of the packages to which it affixed each respective type of stamp or similar information for roll-your-own on which tax was paid and (b) the total number of cigarettes acquired by the stamping agent during that month for sale in or into the state or for sale from this state into another state, sold in or into the state by the stamping agent during that month and held in inventory in the state or for sale into the state by the stamping agent as of the last business day of that month, in each case identifying by name and number of cigarettes, (i) the manufacturers of those cigarettes and (ii) the brand families of those cigarettes. In the case of a stamping agent that is a retailer, reports under subdivision (1)(a) of this section do not have to include cigarettes contained in packages that bore a stamp required under section 77-2603 or 77-2603.01 at the time the stamping agent received them and that the stamping agent then sold at retail. The stamping agent shall also submit a certification stating that the information provided to the Tax Commissioner is complete and accurate. The stamping agent shall maintain, and make available to the Tax Commissioner, all invoices and documentation of sales of all nonparticipating manufacturer cigarettes and any other information relied upon in reporting to the Tax Commissioner for a period of five years.

(2) The Attorney General may require at any time from the nonparticipating manufacturer proof, from the financial institution in which such manufacturer has established a qualified escrow fund for the purpose of compliance with section 69-2703, of the amount of money in such fund, exclusive of interest, the amounts and dates of each deposit to such fund, and the amounts and dates of each withdrawal from such fund.

(3) In addition to the information required to be submitted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the Tax Commissioner or Attorney General may require a stamping agent, distributor, or tobacco product manufacturer to submit any additional information, including, but not limited to, samples of the packaging or labeling of each brand family, as is necessary to enable the Tax Commissioner or Attorney General to determine whether a tobacco product manufacturer is in compliance with sections 69-2704 to 69-2711.

(4) The Tax Commissioner or the Attorney General may require production of information sufficient to enable the Tax Commissioner or Attorney General to determine the adequacy of the amount of a quarterly escrow deposit under subdivision (2) of section 69-2703. The Tax Commissioner may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations implementing how tobacco product manufacturers subject to subdivision (2) of section 69-2703 make quarterly payments.

Laws 2003, LB 572, § 5;

Laws 2007, LB580, § 3;

Laws 2011, LB590, § 10;

Laws 2015, LB261, § 4.
March 6, 2015